Utah statutes.
41-6a-1641.   Video display in motor vehicles prohibited if visible to driver -- Exceptions.

(1)  A motor vehicle may not be operated on a highway if the motor vehicle is equipped with a video display located so that the display is visible to the operator of the vehicle.

(2)  This section does not prohibit the use of a video display used exclusively for:

(a)  safety or law enforcement purposes if the use is approved by rule of the department under Section 41-6a-1601;

(b)  motor vehicle navigation; or

(c)  monitoring of equipment and operating systems of the motor vehicle.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

